Utah statutes.
73-26-107.   Development of hydropower generating works -- Power offered to
public utilities or municipalities.
(1)  In association with a project authorized under this chapter, the division
may:
(a)  construct and own hydroelectric generating works and incidental
electrical facilities for the purposes stated in Subsection (2); or
(b)  enter into an agreement with a public utility or municipality for the
development and operation of hydroelectric generating works and incidental
electrical facilities.
(2)  Power and energy derived from any hydroelectric generating works owned by
the division, except for power and energy needed for project operations, must
be offered to public utilities or municipalities in the state for distribution
to electric consumers.
